Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2623
Appropriation to Child Care Grant Fund; legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes that a shortage of quality, affordable, and accessible child care exists to the detriment of families and employers throughout the state. Workers are unable to enter or remain in the work force due to a shortage of child care resources. The high costs of starting or expanding a child care business creates a barrier to the creation of additional space, especially for infants and children with special needs. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred fifty thousand dollars annually to the Child Care Grant Fund from funds designated by the State of Nebraska under the Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 1990.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 22.